dev/saldo/saldo.verbs.dix
    <pardef n="sj/unka__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>unkas</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unka</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkits</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkit</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unk</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unket</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkets</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nt"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unken</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkens</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ut"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkna</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unknas</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkne</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unknes</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkna</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unknas</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkna</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unknas</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>önks</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>önk</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>önkes</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>önke</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkande</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkandes</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkes</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unks</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unker</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unkes</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>unke</l><r>unka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/yka__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>yka</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ykt</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ukit</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yk</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ök</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ykte</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öke</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ykande</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ykandes</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yker</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yke</l><r>yka<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="smygs/upa__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>upas</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upa</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upits</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upit</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>up</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öps</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öp</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öpes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>öpe</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upande</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upandes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ups</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uper</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upes</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>upe</l><r>upa<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="konj"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kyss/as__vblex">
      <e><p>          <l>as</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ts</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>tes</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>es</l><r>as<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="indic"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="sjunka"><i>sj</i><par n="sj/unka__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="klösas"><i>klös</i><par n="kyss/as__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skåpsupa"><i>skåps</i><par n="smygs/upa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ryka"><i>r</i><par n="r/yka__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="försjunka"><i>försj</i><par n="sj/unka__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="smygsupa"><i>smygs</i><par n="smygs/upa__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kyssas"><i>kyss</i><par n="kyss/as__vblex"/></e>
